Utah statutes.
59-2-1315.   Disposition of fines and forfeitures.

The fines and forfeitures incurred by violation of any of the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the treasury for the use of the county where the property is located.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 3, 1988 General Session

